Virginia statutes. Title 30. General Assembly.
Chapter 14. Auditor of Public Accounts.
§ 30-140.
Certain political subdivisions to file report of audit; period in which report kept as public record; when audit not required; sworn statement of exempted entities; publication of summary of financial condition; repeal of conflicting provisions.

Each authority, commission, district, or other political subdivision the members of whose governing body are not elected by popular vote shall annually, within five months after the end of its fiscal year, have an audit performed covering its financial transactions for such fiscal year according to the specifications of the Auditor of Public Accounts and file with the Auditor of Public Accounts a copy of the report, unless exempted in accordance with subsection B.Each authority, commission, district, or other political subdivision the members of whose governing body are not elected by popular vote and which is reported in the Commonwealth’s Comprehensive Annual Financial Report as determined by the State Comptroller and the Auditor of Public Accounts shall annually, within three months after the end of its fiscal year, have an audit performed covering its financial transactions for such fiscal year according to the specifications of the Auditor of Public Accounts and file with the Auditor of Public Accounts a copy of the report, unless exempted in accordance with subsection B.The Auditor of Public Accounts shall receive such reports required by this subsection and keep the same as public records for a period of 10 years from their receipt.

No audit, however, shall be required for any fiscal year during which such entity’s financial transactions did not exceed the sum of $25,000.As used in this section, “financial transactions” shall not include financial transactions involving notes, bonds, or other evidences of indebtedness of such entity the proceeds of which are held or advanced by a corporate trustee or other financial institution and not received or disbursed directly by such entity.In the event an audit is not required, the entity shall file a statement under oath certifying that the transactions did not exceed such sum and, as to all transactions involving notes, bonds, or other evidences of indebtedness that are exempted, the statement shall be accompanied by an affidavit from the trustee or financial institution certifying that it has performed the duties required under the agreement governing such transactions. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the Auditor of Public Accounts may require an audit if he deems it to be necessary to determine the propriety of the entity’s financial transactions.In the case of a water and sewer authority required by a governing body to have an audit conducted as specified in §

15.2-5145

, the authority shall file the certified audit with the Auditor of Public Accounts.At the time the report required by this section is filed with the Auditor of Public Accounts every such authority, commission, district, or other political subdivision, except those exempted from the audit report requirement, shall publish, in a newspaper of general circulation in the county, city, or town wherein the authority, commission, district, or other political subdivision is located, a summary statement reflecting the financial condition of the authority, commission, district, or other political subdivision, which shall include a reference to where the detailed statement may be found.Any provision of law, general or special, which by its terms requires an audit that is not required by this section shall be repealed to the extent of any conflict.

History.

Code 1950, § 2-135.1; 1956, c. 298; 1958, c. 534; 1966, c. 677, § 2.1-164; 1978, c. 617; 1981, c. 547; 1982, c. 631; 2001, c. 844; 2014, c. 509; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 127.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 509, in subsection B, substituted “$25,000” for “$5,000.”

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 127, effective July 1, 2021, in subsection A, substituted “five months” for “three months” in the first paragraph and inserted the second paragraph and inserted “required by this subsection” in the third paragraph; and made minor stylistic changes.

§ 30-141.
Annual report.

The Auditor of Public Accounts shall make an annual report of the activities of his office to the Governor and the General Assembly.

History.

Code 1950, § 2-144; 1966, c. 677, § 2.1-172.1; 2001, c. 844.

§ 30-142.
Assumption of duties by Joint Legislative Audit and Review Commission upon failure of Auditor to perform; procedure.

Whenever the General Assembly is not in session, the Joint Legislative Audit and Review Commission may perform any of the duties of the Auditor of Public Accounts upon its determination that the Auditor is unable or unwilling to perform any of his duties by reason of incapacity, malfeasance in office, neglect of duty, conflict of interest, or criminal activity relating to the performance of his duties. Such action shall, after notice to the Auditor of Public Accounts and an opportunity to be heard, require a three-fifths vote of all Commission members and shall be effective until the House of Delegates, acting at the next regular or special session of the General Assembly, determines whether to institute impeachment proceedings against the Auditor, as provided in Article IV, Section 17 of the Constitution of Virginia or until the Joint Legislative Audit and Review Commission, by a majority vote of its membership, determines that the Auditor of Public Accounts can resume the performance of his duties. Upon institution of impeachment proceedings by the House of Delegates, the Commission may continue to perform such duties until the conclusion of impeachment proceedings.

History.

1979, c. 441, § 2.1-155.2; 2001, c. 844.